Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5356XD (6) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 13B.13, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 13B.13 State public defender pilot project ââ child welfare 3 legal representation project to preserve families . 4 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the 5 contrary, for each fiscal year for the period beginning July 1, 6 2020, and ending June 30, 2025, the state public defender may 7 establish a pilot shall administer and maintain the project to 8 implement innovative models of legal representation in order 9 preserve families to assist families involved in the child 10 welfare system. The state public defender shall have sole 11 discretion to establish and implement the pilot project. 12 2. The state public defender may implement administer and 13 maintain the new pilot project in up to sixteen counties to 14 preserve families throughout the state. 15 3. The purpose of the pilot project is to preserve families 16 shall implement , administer, and study innovative ways models 17 of legal representation , through a team approach or through 18 other methods, to achieve positive outcomes for families, 19 reduce trauma to young children, and deliver financial benefits 20 to families and their communities. 21 4. The state public defender may coordinate with other 22 agencies and organizations to implement the pilot project 23 administer and maintain , seek grant funding for , and measure 24 the results analyze the outcomes of the project to preserve 25 families . 26 5. The state public defender may appoint an attorney to 27 represent an indigent person prior to initiation of formal 28 proceedings, without court order, if such representation is 29 deemed appropriate by the state public defender and relates to 30 the purposes of the pilot project to preserve families . 31 6. The state public defender may adopt rules pursuant to 32 chapter 17A to administer this section. 33